Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.640

Solicitation of bribe by voter.

Any person who solicits, requests, or demands, directly or indirectly, any reward or thing of value or the promise thereof in exchange for his or her vote or in exchange for the vote of any other person for or against any candidate or for or against any ballot measure to be voted upon at a primary or special or general election is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2130. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 7; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.090; prior: 1907 c 209 s 32; RRS s 5207. Formerly RCW 29.85.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.